voikko-fi/vvfst/asemosanat.lexc
! Voikko-fi, suomen kielen muoto-opin kuvaus.
!
! Tekijänoikeus © 2006 - 2015 Hannu Väisänen (Etunimi.Sukunimi@joensuu.fi)
!                 2006 - 2015 Harri Pitkänen (hatapitk@iki.fi)
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
! it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation; either version 2, or (at your option)
! any later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
! WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
! MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
! General Public License for more details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
! along with this program; see the file COPYING.  If not, write to the
! Free Software Foundation, Inc., 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA
! 02110-1301, USA.

LEXICON Asemosana
[Lr][Xp]eräs[X]erä:erä	AsemosanaVieras_ä	;
[Lr][Xp]he[X]he:he	AsemosanaMe	;
[Lr][Xp]hän[X]hä:hä	AsemosanaHän	;
[Lr][Xp]joka[X]jo:jo	AsemosanaJoka	;
[Lr][Xp]jokin[X]jo:jo	AsemosanaJokin	;
[Lr][Xp]joku[X]jo:jo	AsemosanaJoku	;
[Lr][Xp]jompikumpi[X]jom:jom	AsemosanaJompikumpi	;
[Lr][Xp]ken[X]ke:ke	AsemosanaKen	;
[Lr][Xp]kuka[X]ku:ku	AsemosanaKuka	;
[Lr][Xp]kukin[X]ku:ku	AsemosanaJokinKukin	;
[Lr][Xp]kuka[X]kukas[Sn][Ny]:kukas	Loppu	;
[Lr][Xp]kukaan[X]k:k	AsemosanaKukaan	;
[Lr][Xp]kumpainen[X]kumpai:kumpai	AsemosanaNainen_a	;
[Lr][Xp]kumpi[X]kum:kum	AsemosanaKumpi	;
[Lr][Xp]me[X]me:me	AsemosanaMe	;
[Lr][Xp]mikä[X]mi:mi	AsemosanaMikä	;
[Lr][Xp]mikään[X]mi:mi	AsemosanaMikään	;
[Lr][Xp]mikin[X]mi:mi	AsemosanaMikin	;
[Lr][Xp]minä[X]min:min	AsemosanaMinä	;
[Lr][Xp]mones[X]mone:mone	JärjestyslukuKahdeksasEiOmistusliitettä_a	;
[Lr][Xp]moni[X][Sp][Ny]montaa:montaa	Liitesana_a	;
[Lr][Xp]muu[X]mu:mu	AsemosanaPuu_a	;
[Lr][Xp]muuan[X]muu:muu	AsemosanaMuuan	;
[Lr][Xp]ne[X]n:n	AsemosanaNe	;
[Lr][Xp]nuo[X]n:n	AsemosanaNuo	;
[Lr][Xp]nämä[X]nä:nä	AsemosanaNämä	;
[Lr][Xp]se[X]s:s	AsemosanaSe	;
[Lr][Xp]sinä[X]sin:sin	AsemosanaMinä	;
[Lr][Xp]te[X]te:te	AsemosanaMe	;
[Lr][Xp]tuo[X]tuo:tuo	AsemosanaTuo	;
?Murre [Lr][Xp]tuo[X]to:to	AsemosanaTuo2	;
[Lr][Xp]tämä[X]tä:tä	AsemosanaTämä	;
?Murre [Lr][Xp]mä[X]m:m	AsemosanaMä	;
?Murre [Lr][Xp]sä[X]s:s	AsemosanaMä	;
?Murre [Lr][Xp]mie[X]mi:mi	AsemosanaMie	;
?Murre [Lr][Xp]sie[X]si:si	AsemosanaMie	;

LEXICON AsemosanaMä
[Sn][Ny]ä:ä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sp][Ny]ua:ua	Liitesana_a	;
AsemosanaMäMie	;

LEXICON AsemosanaMie
[Sn][Ny]e:e	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sp][Ny]uta:uta	Liitesana_a	;
AsemosanaMäMie	;

LEXICON AsemosanaMäMie
[Sg][Ny]un:un	Liitesana_a	;
[Sak][Ny]ut:ut	Liitesana_a	;
[Str][Ny]uksi:uksi	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Ny]una:una	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Ny]ussa:ussa	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Ny]usta:usta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Ny]uhun:uhun	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Ny]ulla:ulla	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Ny]ulta:ulta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Ny]ulle:ulle	Liitesana_a	;

LEXICON AsemosanaMe
[Sn][Nm]:	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sg][Nm]idän:idän	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sp][Nm]itä:itä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sak][Nm]idät:idät	Liitesana_ä	;
[Str][Nm]iksi:iksi	Liitesana_ä	;
[Ses][Nm]inä:inä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sine][Nm]issä:issä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sela][Nm]istä:istä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sill][Nm]ihin:ihin	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sade][Nm]illä:illä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sabl][Nm]iltä:iltä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sall][Nm]ille:ille	Liitesana_ä	;

LEXICON AsemosanaHän
[Sn][Ny]n:n	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sg][Ny]nen:nen	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sp][Ny]ntä:ntä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sak][Ny]net:net	Liitesana_ä	;
[Str][Ny]neksi:neksi	Liitesana_ä	;
[Ses][Ny]nenä:nenä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sine][Ny]nessä:nessä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sela][Ny]nestä:nestä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sill][Ny]neen:neen	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sade][Ny]nellä:nellä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sabl][Ny]neltä:neltä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sall][Ny]nelle:nelle	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sade][Ny]llä:llä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sabl][Ny]ltä:ltä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sall][Ny]lle:lle	Liitesana_ä	;

LEXICON AsemosanaKen
[Sn][Ny]n:n	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sg][Ny]nen:nen	AsemosanaKä	;
[Sg][Ny]nenkäs:nenkäs	Loppu	;
[Sp][Ny]tä:tä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sak][Ny]net:net	AsemosanaKä	;
[Str][Ny]neksi:neksi	AsemosanaKä	;
[Ses][Ny]nenä:nenä	AsemosanaKä	;
[Ses][Ny]nä:nä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sine][Ny]nessä:nessä	AsemosanaKä	;
[Sela][Ny]nestä:nestä	AsemosanaKä	;
[Sill][Ny]neen:neen	AsemosanaKä	;
[Sill][Ny]hen:hen	AsemosanaKä	;
[Sill][Ny]henkäs:henkäs	Loppu	;
[Sade][Ny]nellä:nellä	AsemosanaKä	;
[Sade][Ny]llä:llä	AsemosanaKä	;
[Sabl][Ny]neltä:neltä	AsemosanaKä	;
[Sabl][Ny]ltä:ltä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sall][Ny]nelle:nelle	AsemosanaKä	;
[Sall][Ny]lle:lle	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sade][Ny]llä:llä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sabl][Ny]ltä:ltä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sall][Ny]lle:lle	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sn][Nm]tkä:tkä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sg][Nm]iden:iden	AsemosanaKä	;
[Sg][Nm]itten:itten	AsemosanaKä	;
[Sp][Nm]itä:itä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Str][Nm]iksi:iksi	Liitesana_ä	;
[Ses][Nm]inä:inä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sine][Nm]issä:issä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sela][Nm]istä:istä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sill][Nm]ihin:ihin	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sade][Nm]illä:illä	AsemosanaKä	;
[Sabl][Nm]iltä:iltä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sall][Nm]ille:ille	Liitesana_ä	;

LEXICON AsemosanaKukaan
[Sn][Ny]ukaan:ukaan	LiitesanaKinKoPaHan_a	;
[Sp][Ny]etään:etään	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sine][Ny]ussaan:ussaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Ny]ustaan:ustaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Ny]essään:essään	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sela][Ny]estään:estään	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sade][Ny]ellään:ellään	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sabl][Ny]eltään:eltään	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sn][Nm]etkään:etkään	LiitesanaKinKoPaHan_ä	;
[Sp][Nm]eitään:eitään	Liitesana_ä	;

LEXICON AsemosanaKä
Liitesana_ä	;
kä:kä	LiitesanaKinKoPaHan_ä	;

LEXICON AsemosanaKuka
AsemosanaJokaKuka	;
[Sn][Ny]ka:ka	LiitesanaKoPaHan_a	;
[Sn][Ny]ka[Fkin]kin:kakin	Loppu	;
[Sill][Ny]hun:hun	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Ny]hunka:hunka	Loppu	;

LEXICON AsemosanaJoka
AsemosanaJokaKuka	;
[Sn][Ny]ka:ka	Loppu	;
[Str][Ny]ksika:ksika	Loppu	;
[Sill][Ny]hon:hon	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Ny]honka:honka	Loppu	;
[Sill][Ny]nneka:nneka	Loppu	;
[Str][Nm]iksika:iksika	Loppu	;
[Sill][Nm]ihinka:ihinka	Loppu	;
[Sg][Nm]idenka:idenka	Loppu	;
[Sg][Nm]ittenka:ittenka	Loppu	;

LEXICON AsemosanaJokaKuka
[Sg][Ny]nka:nka	Loppu	;
[Sp][Ny]ta:ta	Liitesana_a	;
[Str][Ny]ksi:ksi	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Ny]na:na	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Ny]ssa:ssa	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Ny]sta:sta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Ny]nne:nne	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Ny]lla:lla	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Ny]lta:lta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Ny]lle:lle	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Ny]lleka:lleka	Loppu	;
[Sn][Nm]tka:tka	Loppu	;
[Sg][Nm]iden:iden	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Nm]itten:itten	Liitesana_a	;
[Sp][Nm]ita:ita	Liitesana_a	;
[Str][Nm]iksi:iksi	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Nm]ina:ina	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Nm]issa:issa	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Nm]ista:ista	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Nm]ihin:ihin	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Nm]illa:illa	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Nm]ilta:ilta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Nm]ille:ille	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Nm]illeka:illeka	Loppu	;
[Sko][Nm]ine:ine	Loppu	;

LEXICON AsemosanaJokinKukin
[Sn][Ny]kin:kin	Loppu	;
[Sg][Ny]nkin:nkin	Loppu	;
[Sn][Nm]tkin:tkin	Loppu	;

LEXICON AsemosanaJoku
[Sn][Ny]ku:ku	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Ny]nkun:nkun	Liitesana_a	;
[Sp][Ny]ta[Bm]kuta:takuta	Liitesana_a	;
[Str][Ny]ksi[Bm]kuksi:ksikuksi	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Ny]na[Bm]kuna:nakuna	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Ny]ssa[Bm]kussa:ssakussa	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Ny]sta[Bm]kusta:stakusta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Ny]hon[Bm]kuhun:honkuhun	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Ny]lla[Bm]kulla:llakulla	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Ny]lta[Bm]kulta:ltakulta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Ny]lle[Bm]kulle:llekulle	Liitesana_a	;
[Sab][Ny]tta[Bm]kutta:ttakutta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sn][Nm]tkut:tkut	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Nm]iden[Bm]kuiden:idenkuiden	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Nm]itten[Bm]kuitten:ittenkuitten	Liitesana_a	;
[Sp][Nm]ita[Bm]kuita:itakuita	Liitesana_a	;
[Str][Nm]iksi[Bm]kuiksi:iksikuiksi	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Nm]ina[Bm]kuina:inakuina	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Nm]issa[Bm]kuissa:issakuissa	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Nm]ista[Bm]kuista:istakuista	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Nm]ihin[Bm]kuihin:ihinkuihin	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Nm]illa[Bm]kuilla:illakuilla	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Nm]ilta[Bm]kuilta:iltakuilta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Nm]ille[Bm]kuille:illekuille	Liitesana_a	;
[Sab][Nm]itta[Bm]kutta:ittakutta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sin][Nm]ine[Bm]kuine:inekuine	Liitesana_a	;

LEXICON AsemosanaJokin
AsemosanaJokinKukin	;
[Sp][Ny]tain:tain	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Ny]nain:nain	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Ny]ssain:ssain	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Ny]stain:stain	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Ny]llain:llain	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Ny]ltain:ltain	Liitesana_a	;
[Sp][Nm]itain:itain	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Nm]inain:inain	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Nm]issain:issain	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Nm]istain:istain	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Nm]illain:illain	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Nm]iltain:iltain	Liitesana_a	;

LEXICON AsemosanaKumpi
[Sn][Ny]pi:pi	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Ny]man:man	Liitesana_a	;
[Sp][Ny]paa:paa	Liitesana_a	;
[Str][Ny]maksi:maksi	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Ny]pana:pana	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Ny]massa:massa	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Ny]masta:masta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Ny]paan:paan	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Ny]malla:malla	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Ny]malta:malta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Ny]malle:malle	Liitesana_a	;
[Sn][Nm]mat:mat	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Nm]pien:pien	Liitesana_a	;
[Sp][Nm]pia:pia	Liitesana_a	;
[Str][Nm]miksi:miksi	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Nm]pina:pina	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Nm]missa:missa	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Nm]mista:mista	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Nm]piin:piin	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Nm]milla:milla	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Nm]milta:milta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Nm]mille:mille	Liitesana_a	;

LEXICON AsemosanaJompikumpi
[Sn][Ny]pi[Bm]kumpi:pikumpi	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Ny]man[Bm]kumman:mankumman	Liitesana_a	;
[Sp][Ny]paa[Bm]kumpaa:paakumpaa	Liitesana_a	;
[Str][Ny]maksi[Bm]kummaksi:maksikummaksi	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Ny]pana[Bm]kumpana:panakumpana	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Ny]massa[Bm]kummassa:massakummassa	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Ny]masta[Bm]kummasta:mastakummasta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Ny]paan[Bm]kumpaan:paankumpaan	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Ny]malla[Bm]kummalla:mallakummalla	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Ny]malta[Bm]kummalta:maltakummalta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Ny]malle[Bm]kummalle:mallekummalle	Liitesana_a	;
[Sab][Ny]matta[Bm]kummatta:mattakummatta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sn][Nm]mat[Bm]kummat:matkummat	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Nm]pien[Bm]kumpien:pienkumpien	Liitesana_a	;
[Sg][Nm]pain[Bm]kumpain:painkumpain	Liitesana_a	;
[Sp][Nm]pia[Bm]kumpia:piakumpia	Liitesana_a	;
[Str][Nm]miksi[Bm]kummiksi:miksikummiksi	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Nm]pina[Bm]kumpina:pinakumpina	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Nm]missa[Bm]kummissa:missakummissa	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Nm]mista[Bm]kummista:mistakummista	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Nm]piin[Bm]kumpiin:piinkumpiin	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Nm]milla[Bm]kummilla:millakummilla	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Nm]milta[Bm]kummilta:miltakummilta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Nm]mille[Bm]kummille:millekummille	Liitesana_a	;
[Sab][Nm]mitta[Bm]kummitta:mittakummitta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sko][Nm]pine[Bm]kumpine:pinekumpine	Liitesana_a	;
[Sin][Nm]min[Bm]kummin:minkummin	Liitesana_a	;

LEXICON AsemosanaMinä
[Sn][Ny]ä:ä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sg][Ny]un:un	Liitesana_a	;
[Sp][Ny]ua:ua	Liitesana_a	;
[Sak][Ny]ut:ut	Liitesana_a	;
[Str][Ny]uksi:uksi	Liitesana_a	;
[Ses][Ny]una:una	Liitesana_a	;
[Sine][Ny]ussa:ussa	Liitesana_a	;
[Sela][Ny]usta:usta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sill][Ny]uun:uun	Liitesana_a	;
[Sade][Ny]ulla:ulla	Liitesana_a	;
[Sabl][Ny]ulta:ulta	Liitesana_a	;
[Sall][Ny]ulle:ulle	Liitesana_a	;

LEXICON AsemosanaSe
[Sn][Ny]e:e	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sg][Ny]en:en	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sp][Ny]itä:itä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Str][Ny]iksi:iksi	Liitesana_ä	;
[Ses][Ny]inä:inä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sine][Ny]iinä:iinä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sela][Ny]iitä:iitä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sill][Ny]iihen:iihen	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sade][Ny]illä:illä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sabl][Ny]iltä:iltä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sall][Ny]ille:ille	Liitesana_ä	;

LEXICON AsemosanaNe
[Sn][Nm]e:e	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sg][Nm]iiden:iiden	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sg][Nm]iitten:iitten	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sp][Nm]iitä:iitä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Str][Nm]iiksi:iiksi	Liitesana_ä	;
[Ses][Nm]iinä:iinä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sine][Nm]iissä:iissä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sela][Nm]iistä:iistä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sill][Nm]iihin:iihin	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sade][Nm]iillä:iillä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sabl][Nm]iiltä:iiltä	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sall][Nm]iille:iille	Liitesana_ä	;
[Sko][Nm]iine:iine	Liitesana_ä	;
